Wyoming, session 2025, HB0271.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi) and 9-4-719(g) and
(h)(v) are amended to read:

9-4-601. Distribution and use; funds, accounts,
cities and towns benefited; exception for bonus payments.
HB0271

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0571

(d) Except as provided in subsections (k), (m), (n)
and (o) of this section, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of two hundred
million dollars ($200,000,000.00) shall be distributed as
follows:

(vi) From the amounts which would otherwise be
distributed to the public school foundation program account
under paragraph (iii) of this subsection and paragraphs
(k)(i), (m)(i), (n)(i) and (o)(i) of this section, there is
annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund
reserve account accounts specified in this paragraph the
amount determined under W.S. 9-4-719(g). The appropriation
shall be credited to the account as provided in W.S.
9-4-719(g) in accordance with the following:

(A) Subject to subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph, the appropriation under this paragraph shall be
credited to the common school account within the permanent
land fund and the common school permanent fund reserve
account in equal amounts;

HB0271

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0571
(B) When the balance of the common school
permanent fund reserve account is in excess of four hundred
twenty percent (420%) of the spending policy amount
specified in W.S. 9-4-719(h)(v), the appropriation under
this paragraph shall be credited to the common school
account within the permanent land fund.

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy;
permanent funds.

(g) There is annually appropriated to the common
school permanent fund reserve account accounts specified in
W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi) an amount determined under this
subsection from funds as provided in W.S. 9-4-601(d)(vi).
The amount shall be computed and calculated by the state
treasurer. The amount shall be equal to the extent to which
earnings from the common school account within the
permanent land fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iv) exceed the
spending policy established in subsection (h) of this
section for that fiscal year. The appropriation shall be
credited to the account appropriate accounts as soon as
practicable after the end of the fiscal year but no later
than ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year.
HB0271

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0571

(h) The annual spending policy for the common school
account within the permanent land fund is for each fiscal
year (FY):

(v) An amount equal to five percent (5%) four
and one-half percent (4.5%) of the previous five (5) year
average market value of the account, calculated from the
first day of the fiscal year.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0271